Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-273
County supervisors; special meetings; notice.

Special meetings of the county board shall be held only when requested by at least one-third of the members of the board, which request shall be in writing, addressed to the clerk of the board, and specifying the time and object of such meeting. Upon receipt of such request, the clerk shall immediately notify in writing each member of the board of the time and object of such meeting, and shall cause notice of such meeting to be published in some newspaper of the county, if any shall be published therein; Provided, no business shall be transacted at any special meeting except such as is specified in the call.

Laws 1879, § 63, p. 371;

R.S.1913, § 1065;

C.S.1922, § 967;

C.S.1929, § 26-281;

R.S.1943, § 23-273.